Tennessee, session 114, SB2425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-106, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(s) When determining the eligibility of an individual for residential facility benefits,
any scoring or evaluation that takes into consideration the individual's physical and
mental well-being must evaluate the individual's physical condition and mental condition
separately. As used in this subsection (s), "residential facility" includes, but is not limited
to, a nursing home, skilled nursing facility, recuperation center, rehabilitation facility,
home for the aged, and adult care home.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2425
011197
- 1 -